Washington statutes.
RCW 19.280.080

Combined heat and power systems—Power purchase agreements.

(1) The legislature finds that power purchase agreements of a minimum of fifteen years for the electric output of combined heat and power systems may be advantageous to both electric utilities and the owners or operators of combined heat and power systems.

(2) Electric utilities with over twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington are encouraged to offer a minimum term of fifteen years for new power purchase agreements for the electric output of combined heat and power systems beginning December 31, 2016.

(3) The commission may authorize recovery of the actual cost of fuel incurred by an electrical company under a power purchase agreement for the electric output of a combined heat and power system.

(4) The governing body of a consumer-owned utility that offers a fifteen-year minimum term for a power purchase agreement for the electric output of a combined heat and power system may, every five years after signing the agreement, initiate a fuel cost adjustment process in order to recover the actual cost of fuel incurred by the consumer-owned utility under a power purchase agreement under this section.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 19 s 7.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 19: See note following RCW 39.35.010.